Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB292.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2025-2026.Section 2. Total authorizations.(a) Public improvements.--The total authorization for the additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects itemized in section 3 and to be acquired or 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 constructed by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $21,480,216,000.(b) Furniture and equipment.--The total authorization for the additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment to complete public improvement projects itemized in section 4 and to be acquired by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $633,994,000.(c) Transportation assistance.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects itemized in section 5 with respect to which an interest is to be acquired in or constructed by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $1,686,000,000.(d) Redevelopment assistance.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of redevelopment capital projects itemized in section 6 for capital grants by the Department of Community and Economic Development, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $0.(e) Flood control.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of flood control projects itemized in section 7 and to be constructed by the Department of Environmental Protection, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $9,900,000.(f) Fish Fund and Boat Fund.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of public improvement projects itemized in section 8 to be acquired or developed by 20250SB0292PN0269 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and to be financed by the incurring of debt or by current revenues of the Fish Fund and the Boat Fund pursuant to executive authorization shall be $199,400,000.Section 3. Itemization of public improvement capital projects.Additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects to be acquired or constructed by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt, are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Agriculture(i) Pennsylvania State University College of Agricultural Sciences, Centre County(A) Plant Science Facility to allow for cross-disciplinary innovation and research, including research facility, greenhouse, head house and climate-controlled plant production featuresProject Allocation 30,000,000(B) Animal Diagnostic Laboratory construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 6,127,000(ii) Livestock Evaluation Center, Centre County20250SB0292PN0269 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(iii) New Bolton Center, Chester County(A) Construction of Pennsylvania Equine Toxicology and Research Laboratory on New Bolton Campus of The University of PennsylvaniaProject Allocation 20,000,000(iv) Annex, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 8,000,000(v) Farm Show Complex, Dauphin County(A) Construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 35,000,000(vi) Headquarters, Veterinary Laboratory and Farm Show Complex, Dauphin County(A) Upgrade security system and camerasProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Entomology Laboratory, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisition20250SB0292PN0269 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(viii) Greenhouse and Nematology Laboratory, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 10,000,000(ix) Animal Health Diagnostic Laboratory(A) Renovations, additions and construction, including site and infrastructure improvements for design and construction to satisfy modern testing proceduresProject Allocation 75,500,000(x) Headquarters, Department of Agriculture, Dauphin County(A) Renovations, additions and construction, including site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(2) Department of Conservation and Natural Resources(i) Point State Park, Allegheny County(A) Portal bridge replacement and park sidewalk rehabilitation and ADA improvementsProject Allocation 3,750,000(B) Construct new parking facilities, park office, rehabilitate flag bastion 20250SB0292PN0269 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area and install solar arraysProject Allocation 14,000,000(ii) Blue Knob State Park, Bedford County(A) Rehabilitation of Blue Knob Ski area, including improved facilities, parking, roadway and viewscapes to promote year-round recreationProject Allocation 25,000,000(iii) Delaware Canal State Park, Bucks County(A) Visitor center, park office and site rehabilitationProject Allocation 25,000,000(iv) Gallitzin State Forest, Cambria County(A) Construct new district officeProject Allocation 12,000,000(v) Elk State Forest, Cameron County(A) Replace Brooks Run forest maintenance headquarters and storage buildingProject Allocation 3,750,000(B) Hicks Run Forest maintenance headquarters and five-bay pole buildingProject Allocation 1,250,000(vi) Forest Fire Protection, Centre County(A) Construct new regional air operations facilityProject Allocation 3,750,000(vii) Penn Nursery, Centre County(A) Construct new seed extraction building20250SB0292PN0269 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,250,000(viii) Sproul State Forest, Centre County(A) Replace Snowshoe maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 2,500,000(ix) Big Elk Creek State Park, Chester County(A) State park development phase 2 and land acquisitionProject Allocation 17,500,000(x) Moshannon State Forest, Clearfield County(A) Demolish Dague Mechanics Shop and replace with modern mechanics shopProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Repairs to Shaggers Inn DamProject Allocation 5,000,000(xi) Parker Dam State Park, Clearfield County(A) Dam repairs and lake dredgingProject Allocation 11,250,000(xii) Bald Eagle State Forest, Clinton County(A) Construct new wood shop, groomer storage and pole storage buildingProject Allocation 5,625,000(xiii) Forestry Lab, Dauphin County(A) Construction of new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 35,000,000(xiv) Geologic Survey Headquarters, Dauphin County(A) Construct a new headquarters building 20250SB0292PN0269 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the Bureau of Geologic SurveyProject Allocation 30,000,000(xv) Presque Isle State Park, Erie County(A) Sand nourishmentProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Dune replacement and resource workProject Allocation 12,500,000(C) Roads and multipurpose trail rehabilitationProject Allocation 8,750,000(xvi) Cornplanter State Park, Forest County(A) Construct new resource management center and storage buildingProject Allocation 7,000,000(xvii) Michaux State Forest, Franklin County(A) Construct resource management center and storage buildingProject Allocation 21,500,000(xviii) Buchanan State Forest, Fulton County(A) Replace Sideling Hill maintenance headquarters and mechanics shopProject Allocation 2,500,000(xix) Ryerson State State Park, Greene County(A) Resource and recreation improvements Phase 2Project Allocation 12,500,000(xx) Yellow Creek State Park, Indiana County(A) Day use rehabilitationProject Allocation 7,500,000(xxi) Clear Creek State Forest, Jefferson 20250SB0292PN0269 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) New maintenance shop and equipment storageProject Allocation 1,875,000(xxii) Pinchot State Forest, Lackawanna County(A) Breach and remove Edgerton DamProject Allocation 1,250,000(B) Breach and remove Olyphant Dam No. 3 Project Allocation 1,875,000(xxiii) Memorial Lake State Park, Lebanon County(A) Rehabilitate damProject Allocation 14,000,000(xxiv) Forest Fire Protection, Luzerne County(A) Rebuild Hazelton Air Operations building, including site improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxv) Pinchot State Forest, Luzerne County(A) Construct Pinchot forest district resource management center complexProject Allocation 16,500,000(xxvi) Tiadaghton State Forest, Lycoming County(A) Construct new Waterville mechanics garage and storageProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxvii) Tuscarora State Forest, Mifflin County(A) Replace East Licking Creek forest 20250SB0292PN0269 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxviii) Norristown Farm Park, Montgomery County(A) Replace multiple vehicular and pedestrian bridgesProject Allocation 6,250,000(xxix) Shikellamy State Park, Northumberland County(A) Full replacement of dam and permanent causewayProject Allocation 37,500,000(xxx) Delaware State Forest, Pike County(A) Lilly Pond Dam spillway repair and replacementProject Allocation 1,250,000(xxxi) Denton Hill State Park, Potter County(A) Upgrade, rehabilitation or replacement of ski lift, lighting, equipment, parking and structures to improve operations, recreation and public safetyProject Allocation 18,400,000(xxxii) Gallitzin State Forest, Somerset County(A) Raze and replace the Babcock Forest maintenance headquarters and storage buildingProject Allocation 5,625,000(xxxiii) Kooser State Park, Somerset County20250SB0292PN0269 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Day use and dam rehabilitationProject Allocation 6,250,000(xxxiv) Leonard Harrison State Park, Tioga County(A) Turkey Path Trail rehabilitation and realignmentProject Allocation 3,750,000(xxxv) Tioga State Forest, Tioga County(A) Construct new maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Construct new resource management centerProject Allocation 40,000,000(xxxvi) Vosburg Neck State Park, Wyoming County(A) State park development and land acquisition Phase 2Project Allocation 17,500,000(xxxvii) Susquehanna Riverlands State Park, York County(A) State park development and land acquisition Phase 2Project Allocation 17,500,000(xxxviii) State Parks - Statewide(A) Upgrades and improvements to campground washhouses, utilities, site work and other amenities, including new construction, renovations and alterations20250SB0292PN0269 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 25,000,000(B) Rehabilitate historic structuresProject Allocation 12,500,000(C) Critical regulatory system repairs and replacements at multiple water and wastewater treatment plantsProject Allocation 12,500,000(D) New construction, renovations and alterations at roofed overnight colonies, including improvements to supporting infrastructure at multiple locationsProject Allocation 6,250,000(E) Improvements to training academy infrastructure and rangeProject Allocation 37,500,000(F) Dam rehabilitation, lake dredging and various dam impoundmentsProject Allocation 46,000,000(G) Replacement and rehabilitation of multiple maintenance facilitiesProject Allocation 12,500,000(3) Department of Corrections(i) State Correctional Institution at Benner, Centre County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 22,769,000(ii) State Correctional Institution at Rockview, Centre County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 79,151,000(iii) State Correctional Institution at Houtzdale, Clearfield County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,040,000(iv) Quehanna Boot Camp, Clearfield County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,150,000(v) State Correctional Institution at Cambridge Springs, Crawford County20250SB0292PN0269 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 14,629,000(vi) State Correctional Institution at Camp Hill, Cumberland County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 212,961,000(vii) State Correctional Institution at Chester, Delaware County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 15,450,000(viii) State Correctional Institution at Albion, Erie County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including 20250SB0292PN0269 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 27,877,000(ix) State Correctional Institution at Fayette, Fayette County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 11,625,000(x) State Correctional Institution at Forest, Forest County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 42,053,000(xi) State Correctional Institution at Greene, Greene County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvements20250SB0292PN0269 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 23,945,000(xii) State Correctional Institution at Huntingdon, Huntingdon County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 18,670,000(xiii) State Correctional Institution at Smithfield, Huntingdon County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 21,726,000(xiv) State Correctional Institution at Pine Grove, Indiana County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 55,985,000(xv) Elizabethtown Training Facility, Lancaster County20250SB0292PN0269 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 12,888,000(xvi) State Correctional Institution at Dallas, Luzerne County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 24,395,000(xvii) State Correctional Institution at Muncy, Lycoming County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 61,411,000(xviii) State Correctional Institution at Mercer, Mercer County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including 20250SB0292PN0269 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 14,837,000(xix) State Correctional Institution at Graterford, Montgomery County(A) Demolition of facility, including code, permit, site, utility and infrastructure-related issuesProject Allocation 50,173,000(xx) State Correctional Institution at Phoenix, Montgomery County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 14,826,000(xxi) State Correctional Institution at Coal Township, Northumberland County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,543,000(xxii) State Correctional Institution at Frackville, Schuylkill County20250SB0292PN0269 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 42,136,000(xxiii) State Correctional Institution at Mahanoy, Schuylkill County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 41,252,000(xxiv) State Correctional Institution at Laurel Highlands, Somerset County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 22,471,000(xxv) State Correctional Institution at Somerset, Somerset County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including 20250SB0292PN0269 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 30,623,000(xxvi) State Correctional Institution at Waymart, Wayne County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 44,318,000(4) Department of Education(i) Department of Education Headquarters (Reserved)(ii) University of Pittsburgh(A) Building to connect the multiple mid-campus buildings - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(B) Campuswide programmatic and infrastructure upgrades to buildings - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvements and/or renovation and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrades to teaching, research, office and support space, including upgrades to mechanical, electric, plumbing and fire protection systemsProject Allocation 100,000,000(C) Existing apartment building or hotel for student housing - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(D) Former PAA building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvements Project Allocation 180,000,000(E) New laboratory and classroom building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(F) Old Engineering Hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvements20250SB0292PN0269 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 480,000,000(G) Parking garages - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 60,000,000(H) New residence hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 132,000,000(I) Space Research Coordination Center (SRCC) building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(J) Fitzgerald Fieldhouse - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 360,000,000(K) New indoor track and band facility - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure 20250SB0292PN0269 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(L) New multisport athletic and entertainment facility - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvements, including extension of utilitiesProject Allocation 780,000,000(M) One Bigelow Academic Teaching and Research Complex - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 300,000,000(N) New School of Dental Medicine building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(O) New School of Health and Rehabilitation Sciences building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 150,000,000(P) New School of Nursing building - 20250SB0292PN0269 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(Q) New Student Union Building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(R) Track and Field Athletic Field Complex - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(S) Trees Hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development, site infrastructure improvements, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADA, and mechanical, electrical and fire protection systems upgradesProject Allocation 200,000,000(T) Twentieth Century Club building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development, site 20250SB0292PN0269 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure improvement, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADA, and mechanical, electrical and fire protection systems upgradesProject Allocation 100,000,000(U) Western Psychiatric Hospital and Clinic (WPIC) parking garage - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development and site infrastructure improvement, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADAProject Allocation 100,000,000(iii) The Pennsylvania State University(A) Smith Building - Altoona Campus, Blair County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for Smith Building at Penn State Altoona. In order to increase both the recruitment and retention of students, the proposed renovations will provide one-stop shopping for student support as well as provide a more-accessible and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 visible space for the Robert L. Smith Learning Resources Center. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 25,000,000(B) Atherton Street steam line crossing - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Atherton Street Steam Line Crossing at Penn State University Park. This project involves the installation of a new steam line that traverses Atherton Street and will connect West Campus 20250SB0292PN0269 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with the central steam system. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 15,000,000(C) Chiller unit - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a chiller unit at Penn State University Park. This chiller unit will replace an existing, smaller chiller unit which will delay the need of a new chilled water plant. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as 20250SB0292PN0269 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 25,000,000(D) Demolition program - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs), and other related costs for the Demolition Program at Penn State University Park. This project involves the demolition of campus facilities. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation 20250SB0292PN0269 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 20,000,000(E) Electrical interconnection work - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for electrical interconnection work at Penn State University Park. This project will provide a new high-voltage, electrical interconnection between electrical substations to provide a single electrical distribution network. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim 20250SB0292PN0269 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 30,000,000(F) Former Palmer Museum of Art - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Former Palmer Museum of Art at Penn State University Park. The general project scope is to renew the originally constructed 1971 and 1990 buildings to meet the new program which includes both general purpose classrooms and College of Arts and Architecture support spaces. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation 20250SB0292PN0269 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 50,000,000(G) General academic building - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the renovation of a general academic building at Penn State University Park. This project will include administrative areas, support spaces, instructional spaces, seminar rooms and offices. The facility will be equipped with state-of-the-art technology. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation 20250SB0292PN0269 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 70,000,000(H) General research building - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the renovation of a general research building at Penn State University Park. This project will include new research laboratories, support spaces, instructional spaces, seminar rooms, offices and administration space. The facility will be equipped with state-of-the-art technology. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant 20250SB0292PN0269 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 70,000,000(I) Greenhouses and headhouse complexes relocation (PlantWorks) - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the relocation of the greenhouses and headhouse complexes, also known as PlantWorks, at Penn State University Park. The existing, on-campus greenhouses in the Curtin Road complex will be demolished and relocated to an all-new research greenhouse complex on campus. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for 20250SB0292PN0269 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 200,000,000(J) Hot water distribution system - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a hot water distribution system at Penn State University Park. This project will serve as the initial phase of a transition from steam-based heating to hot water-based heating. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be 20250SB0292PN0269 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 70,000,000(K) Millennium Science Complex II - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for Millennium Science Complex II at Penn State University Park. This state-of-the-art facility will serve as the 'hub' for the Institutes for Biomedical and Health Sciences and will push the university to the forefront of biomedical research. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be 20250SB0292PN0269 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 340,000,000(L) Pasquerilla Spiritual Center - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Pasquerilla Spiritual Center at Penn State University Park. The project will address both numerous building deficiencies and the maintenance backlog in the overall facility. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code 20250SB0292PN0269 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 25,000,000(M) Reclaimed water system - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a reclaimed water system at Penn State University Park. Use of a reclaimed water system will greatly reduce the demands of the University on local groundwater systems. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related codesProject Allocation 10,500,000(N) Sackett Building Renovation - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Sackett Building at Penn State University Park. Sackett Building requires buildingwide renewal to include building and life safety system and accessibility upgrades. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 20,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (O) South chiller plant - heat recovery chillers - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for heat recovery chillers at the South chiller plant at Penn State University Park. These heat recovery chillers would add chilled water capacity and provide efficiency, energy, resiliency and operational improvements to the overall system. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 25,000,000(P) Systems Renewal Program - University 20250SB0292PN0269 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at Penn State University Park. This project will allow the university to replace, install or upgrade as appropriate systems in major academic, research and administrative buildings across Penn State University Park. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 120,000,000(Q) Thermal Energy Storage Tank - University Park, Centre County. 20250SB0292PN0269 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a thermal energy storage tank at Penn State University Park. A thermal energy storage tank will provide much-needed flexibility and improved infrastructure to the central chilled water system, all while saving energy and reducing the university's overall carbon footprint. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 50,000,000(R) XLP Cable Replacement Program - University Park, Centre County. 20250SB0292PN0269 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the XLP Cable Replacement Program at Penn State University Park. Replacement of the faulty, 1980s-era XLP cable is a significant safety initiative of the university. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 16,500,000(S) Classroom/Class Lab Building - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a classroom/class lab building at Penn State University Park. This project will include new classrooms, science teaching laboratories, computer labs, seminar rooms, classroom support space and teaching auditoria. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 33,700,000(T) Systems Renewal Program - Milton S. Hershey Medical Center, Dauphin County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. This 20250SB0292PN0269 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 project is part of a continuing effort to make significant, comprehensive upgrades to infrastructure in the College of Medicine facilities at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 30,000,000(U) Water re-use system - Milton S. Hershey Medical Center, Dauphin County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a water re-use system at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. A water re-use 20250SB0292PN0269 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system would treat on-site generated wastewater in order to re-use the treated water. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 10,000,000(V) Stone Valley Forestry Building - University Park, Huntingdon County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Stone Valley Forestry Building at Penn State University Park. This opportunity to erect a new, modern and efficient Stone Valley Forestry Building will certainly enhance the 20250SB0292PN0269 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Forestland Management Office's ability to meet its mission, vision and strategic objectives. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 10,000,000(W) Systems Renewal Program - Statewide Campuses. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at the Commonwealth Campuses. This project will allow the University to replace, install or upgrade as appropriate systems in major academic, research and administrative buildings across 20250SB0292PN0269 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Commonwealth Campuses. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 60,000,000(iv) Temple University(A) Alternative energy infrastructure - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and installation of alternative energy systems, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvements at Temple's domestic campusesProject Allocation 80,000,000(B) Energy services facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a microgrid facility, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 125,000,000(C) Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) Academic Building - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of an energy services facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvementsProject Allocation 300,000,000(D) Facilities and infrastructure renewal - various campuses, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site improvements and other related costs for renovations and retrofits to improve energy efficiency, sustainability and functionality of buildings and infrastructure at domestic campusesProject Allocation 200,000,000(E) Interdisciplinary research facility - Main Campus, Health Sciences Center Campus or Ambler Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction or renovation of a research building, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades, including ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 250,000,000(F) Klein Hall - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction of an academic/administrative building, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades, including ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 185,000,000(G) Microgrid facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a microgrid facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvementsProject Allocation 20,000,000(H) Multiuse facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, renovations and addition to existing historical building for an 20250SB0292PN0269 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adaptive reuse as a multiuse facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgrades.Project Allocation 50,000,000(I) Multiuse facility - Main Campus or Health Sciences Center Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a multiuse facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades, including ADA compliance related upgradesProject Allocation 100,000,000(J) Storm water management systems - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, demolition and installation of storm water management systems, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvements at the Main CampusProject Allocation 50,000,000(K) Revitalization of former University of the Arts facilities - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Acquisition, design, infrastructure improvements, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 abatement of hazardous materials, demolition, renovations and additions to multiple facilities, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 300,000,000(v) Lincoln University(A) 3020 Market Street, University City District, Philadelphia County. Renovation and alterations to third and fourth floor, addition of exterior signage and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Campuswide fire alarm panel upgrades, Chester County. Fire panel replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing and outdated components throughout campusProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Campuswide infrastructure improvements, Chester County. Infrastructure replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing components throughout campusProject Allocation 37,500,000(D) Campuswide Security Improvements, Chester County. Active shooter 20250SB0292PN0269 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hardware upgrades for building doors throughout campusProject Allocation 750,000(E) Campuswide HVAC Improvements, Chester County. HVAC replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing components throughout campusProject Allocation 856,000(F) Center for Black Culture, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(G) Faculty and staff housing upgrades, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Heritage Center, Chester County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and site infrastructure improvements for additionProject Allocation 750,000(I) Historic District, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvements20250SB0292PN0269 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 12,500,000(J) Houston Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(K) Lincoln Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 30,000,000(L) Lucy Laney, Library and Amos House, Chester County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and site infrastructure upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(M) Manuel Rivero (Hall) Gymnasium, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 45,570,000(N) McCauley Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvements20250SB0292PN0269 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 31,250,000(O) McRary Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 33,000,000(P) Nelson Science Center, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(Q) Perimeter road, Chester County. Perimeter road reconfiguration and new guard boothProject Allocation 6,000,000(R) Physical plant, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 15,000,000(S) New residence hall - Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 62,500,000(T) Thurgood Marshall Living Learning 20250SB0292PN0269 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Center, Chester County. HVAC replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing componentsProject Allocation 12,678,000(U) University Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,250,000(V) Ware Center for the Performing Arts, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,250,000(vi) Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology(A) Cottage and Orange Street houses, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipmentProject Allocation 6,000,000(B) Griscom Learning Center and Orange Street Campus, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, HVAC improvements and associated design and construction20250SB0292PN0269 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 14,400,000(C) Hartzell Building, Lancaster County. Renovation, replacement and upgrade of all systems, roof, HVAC, infrastructure and interiors to standards and code, including alterations, new construction, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 17,250,000(D) Historic Almshouse Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 24,150,000(E) Jones Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements, HVAC improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 16,000,000(F) Mellor Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements, exterior painting and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 113,000,000(G) Multipurpose activity center building, Lancaster County. 20250SB0292PN0269 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement and upgrade of campus athletic center roofProject Allocation 6,000,000(H) Schwalm Building Student Center, Lancaster County. Renovate existing facility to provide expanded and improved student center adjacent to planned new dormitory and dining facilityProject Allocation 15,350,000(I) Snyder Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 22,000,000(J) Warehouse, Lancaster County. Renovations and upgrades to main central warehouse, including roof, mechanical and exterior upgradesProject Allocation 4,600,000(K) Dormitories, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, repairs, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction, including HVAC improvementsProject Allocation 36,000,000(L) Improvements, campuswide, Lancaster County. Improvements to meet current and future demands, including land 20250SB0292PN0269 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition, site and building infrastructure improvements, new construction, renovations, additions and building system upgrades and improvements, including associated design and constructionProject Allocation 34,000,000(M) Safety and security upgrades, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipment, including replacement and upgrade of door entrances, swipe card systems and camera monitoring systemsProject Allocation 12,000,000(N) Safety and security upgrades, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipment, including replacement of missing and outdated lighting and equipmentProject Allocation 6,000,000(O) Sidewalks and roads, campuswide, Lancaster County. Sidewalk and road 20250SB0292PN0269 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 repairsProject Allocation 6,000,000(5) Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency(i) Headquarters building, Dauphin County(A) Infrastructure improvements, including replacement of electrical switch gearProject Allocation 6,000,000(B) Renovations, alterations and new construction, including site improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(ii) Special Operations Center(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art training facility, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 95,000,000(6) Department of Environmental Protection(i) Pitcairn Borough Flood Control Project, Allegheny County(A) New flood protection project along Dirty Camp RunProject Allocation 4,000,000(ii) Streets Run Flood Control Project, Allegheny County(A) New flood protection project along Streets RunProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) New Kernsville, Berks County20250SB0292PN0269 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Demolition of warehouse structure and scrap removalProject Allocation 700,000(iv) Northern Cambria Borough flood control, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 2,400,000(v) Wilmore Borough Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) New levee project along Little Conemaugh River and North Branch of Little Conemaugh RiverProject Allocation 3,000,000(vi) Solomon Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Saint Clair Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 2,000,000(viii) Sam's Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 7,000,000(ix) Pine Glen/Avery Cola Company, Centre County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 3,700,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) Alder Run/Thompson Brother Coal Company, Centre County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 2,700,000(xi) Fye/Larry D. Baumgardner Coal Company, Centre County(A) Construction of a chemical treatment system to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 1,350,000(xii) Timothy A. Keck/Keck 1, Clarion County(A) Reclamation of dangerous highwalls and revegetation of the siteProject Allocation 1,100,000(xiii) Buck Run/Al Hamilton Treatment Trust, Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 600,000(xiv) Reed/Sky Haven Treatment Trust, Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 425,000(xv) Manor Mine/Al Hamilton Treatment Trust, Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainageProject Allocation 5,175,000(xvi) Stinky Run Flood Control Project, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Clearfield County(A) Culvert projectProject Allocation 6,000,000(xvii) Big Run/Avery Coal, Clinton County(A) Rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 2,000,000(xviii) Isabella Mine Site, Fayette County(A) Comprehensive reclamation project to address land reclamation, primary discharge structure and conveyance channel for freshwater impoundment and AMD discharge collection and treatment systemProject Allocation 25,000,000(xix) Brockway Clay Company, Jefferson County(A) Reclamation of two abandoned noncoal mining permitsProject Allocation 1,480,000(xx) Weisner Hollow Slurry Dam Reclamation, Jefferson County(A) Regrade a stream channel and close off a coal refuse channel, including the overflow channelsProject Allocation 27,200,000(xxi) Hull Creek, Lackawanna County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxii) Roaring Brook Flood Protection Project, Lackawanna County20250SB0292PN0269 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 11,000,000(xxiii) Ashley - Sulfur Run, Luzerne County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 6,000,000(xxiv) Brown Creek Flood Protection Project, Luzerne County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxv) 21st Centuramics, McKean County(A) Reclamation of dangerous highwalls and revegetation of the siteProject Allocation 2,860,000(xxvi) Port Allegany Borough Flood Control, McKean County(A) Levee projectProject Allocation 25,000,000(xxvii) Glenside Area Flood Protection Project, Montgomery County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxviii) Flat Rock Dam facilities, Philadelphia County(A) Rehabilitation of canal wall and erosion protectionProject Allocation 19,600,000(xxix) Auburn Dam, Schuylkill County(A) Dewatering outfall structure for the dam and dredging/desilting of the reservoir20250SB0292PN0269 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 63,600,000(xxx) Auburn Dam, Schuylkill County(A) Rehabilitation of warehouse and scrap removalProject Allocation 700,000(xxxi) Tamaqua Dam facilities, Schuylkill County(A) Demolition of warehouse and scrap removalProject Allocation 700,000(xxxii) S&K Energy, Inc., Lounder Mine, Washington County(A) Reclamation of highwalls and revegetate the siteProject Allocation 3,220,000(xxxiii) Banning #4 and Euclid Combination Treatment Facility, Westmoreland County(A) Combination treatment facility will be constructed to eliminate the two independent facilities that maintain the underground mine poolProject Allocation 22,000,000(xxxiv) Northmont Area-Greensburg City Flood Control, Westmoreland County(A) Culvert channel and culvert improvementProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxv) Jeannette - Brush Creek, Westmoreland County(A) Rehabilitation and extension of levee 20250SB0292PN0269 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and floodwall flood protection systemProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxvi) Flood Protection Reconstruction Project, Statewide(A) Reconstruction of multiple existing levee street and railroad closure projectsProject Allocation 30,000,000(xxxvii) New laboratory(A) Construction of new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 45,500,000(7) Department of General Services(i) Pedestrian bridges, Dauphin County(A) Construction of bridges across Forster Street and 7th Street, including site acquisition and land development, design and construction and utility workProject Allocation 45,000,000(ii) Warehouse and fleet garage(A) Construction of warehouse and garage facilities, including auxiliary support buildings, site acquisition and land development, design and construction and utility workProject Allocation 200,000,000(iii) Statewide(A) Renovations, alterations, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisition for Department of General Services-owned buildings and structuresProject Allocation 200,000,000(B) Design and construct solar panel and electric vehicle charging stations at Commonwealth facilities, including land acquisition and site and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Professional services for the development of agency facility strategic master plans and capital planningProject Allocation 40,000,000(8) Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission(i) Fort Pitt, Allegheny County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Old Economy Village, Beaver County(A) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 2,000,000(iii) Conrad Weiser Homestead, Berks County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 1,500,000(iv) Daniel Boone Homestead, Berks County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(v) Pennsbury Manor, Bucks County(A) Building, infrastructure and site improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vi) Eckley Miners Village, Carbon County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Pennsylvania Military Museum, Centre County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) State Museum of Pennsylvania, Dauphin County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 30,000,000(ix) State Archives, Dauphin County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 4,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) Anthracite Heritage Museum, Lackawanna County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xi) Landis Valley Village and Farm Museum, Lancaster County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xii) Railroad Museum of Pennsylvania, Lancaster County(A) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiii) Cornwall Iron Furnace, Lebanon County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xiv) Hope Lodge, Montgomery County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 3,000,000(xv) Joseph Priestley House, Northumberland County(A) Building, site and infrastructure 20250SB0292PN0269 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvi) Pennsylvania Lumber Museum, Potter County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xvii) Somerset Historical Center, Somerset County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(xviii) Drake Well Museum, Venango County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xix) Bushy Run Battlefield, Westmoreland County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 7,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xx) Statewide historic sites(A) Renovations, alterations and site upgrades for long-term maintenance, ADA, code and energy improvementsProject Allocation 15,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) Department of Human Services(i) Wernersville State Hospital, Berks County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(ii) Western Secure Treatment Unit, Butler County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(iii) Ebensburg Center, Cambria County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(iv) South Mountain Restoration Center, Franklin County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisition20250SB0292PN0269 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 50,000,000(v) South Mountain Secure Treatment Unit, Franklin County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(vi) Youth Forestry Camp No. 3, Huntingdon County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(vii) Clarks Summit State Hospital, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(viii) North East Secure Treatment Unit, Luzerne County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(ix) Norristown State Hospital, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Additional funds for the design and construction of a psychiatric forensic building on existing lands of the Commonwealth at Norristown State Hospital in West Norriton Township to be utilized for the care and treatment of clients admitted to the institution Project Allocation 250,000,000(x) South East Youth Development Center, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xi) Danville State Hospital, Montour County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xii) North Central Secure Treatment Unit, Montour County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xiii) Loysville Youth Development Center, Perry County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xiv) Selinsgrove Center, Snyder County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xv) Warren State Hospital, Warren County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xvi) Torrance State Hospital, Westmoreland County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(10) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs(i) Gettysburg Readiness Center, Adams County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) Combined Support Maintenance Shop, West Pittsburgh, Allegheny County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(iii) Pittsburgh Crane Readiness Center, Allegheny County20250SB0292PN0269 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(iv) Ford City Readiness Center, Armstrong County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(v) Beaver Falls Readiness Center, Beaver County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(vi) Bedford Readiness Center land, Bedford County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new Readiness CenterProject Allocation 5,000,000(vii) Berks County Readiness Centers, Berks County20250SB0292PN0269 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) Hollidaysburg Readiness Center, Blair County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 27,000,000(ix) Bucks County Readiness Centers, Bucks County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 62,000,000(x) Bucks County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Bucks County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xi) Butler Readiness Center, Butler County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xii) Cambria County Readiness Centers, Cambria County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 35,000,000(xiii) Cambria County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Cambria County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiv) New Cambria Readiness Center, Cambria County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new Readiness CenterProject Allocation 5,000,000(xv) Lehighton Readiness Center, Carbon 20250SB0292PN0269 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xvi) Centre County Readiness Centers, Centre County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 12,000,000(xvii) Centre County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Centre County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xviii) State College Army and Air Readiness Center, Centre County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgrades20250SB0292PN0269 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(xix) Chester County Readiness Centers, Chester County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xx) Chester County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Chester County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxi) Southeastern Veterans Center, Spring City, Chester County(A) Construction of new replacement Community Living CenterProject Allocation 14,400,000(xxii) Clearfield Readiness Center, Clearfield County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxiii) Lock Haven Readiness Center, Clinton County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 19,000,000(xxiv) Crawford County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Crawford County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxv) Carlisle Readiness Center, Cumberland County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxvi) Cumberland Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Cumberland County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxvii) Dauphin County Readiness Centers, Dauphin County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 60,000,000(xxviii) Erie Readiness Center, Erie County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 70,000,000(xxix) Fayette County Readiness Centers, Fayette County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xxx) Chambersburg Readiness Center, Franklin County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxi) Indiana Readiness Center, Indiana County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxxii) Carbondale Readiness Center, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxiii) Lackawanna County Readiness Center/Field Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxiv) Scranton Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County20250SB0292PN0269 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Renovate the facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxv) Elizabethtown Readiness Center, Lancaster County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 22,000,000(xxxvi) New Castle Readiness Center, Lawrence County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 65,000,000(xxxvii) Fort Indiantown Gap, Lebanon County(A) Renovate facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 140,000,000(B) Acquisition of privately owned properties within boundaries of Fort 20250SB0292PN0269 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Indiantown Gap for training and activities of the installationProject Allocation 8,000,000(C) Purchase in-holdings on Fort Indiantown Gap property and/or surrounding property for Joint Land Use agreements/Army Compatible Use Buffers, including acquisition of landProject Allocation 8,000,000(xxxviii) New Lehigh County Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxix) New Lehigh County Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 10,000,000(xl) Allentown Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 70,000,000(xli) Luzerne County Readiness Centers, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Luzerne County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 75,000,000(xlii) New Luzerne County Readiness Center, Luzerne County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 15,000,000(xliii) Williamsport Readiness Center, Lycoming County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xliv) Mercer County Readiness Centers, Mercer County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 30,000,000(xlv) Mercer County Readiness Centers and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintenance facilities, Mercer County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xlvi) Montgomery County Readiness Centers, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xlvii) Montgomery Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 50,000,000(xlviii) Danville Field Maintenance Building, Montour County(A) Renovate facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xlix) Montour County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Montour County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(l) Easton Readiness Center, Northampton County(A) Renovate facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(li) Philadelphia County Readiness Centers, Philadelphia County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 30,000,000(lii) Schuylkill Readiness Center, Schuylkill County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgrades20250SB0292PN0269 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 20,000,000(liii) Friedens Readiness Center, Somerset County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(liv) Washington County Readiness Centers, Washington County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 17,000,000(lv) Honesdale Readiness Center, Wayne County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(lvi) Westmoreland County Readiness Centers, Westmoreland County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 55,000,000(lvii) York County Readiness Centers, York County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(lviii) New Central Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 10,000,000(lix) New Northeastern Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 2,000,000(lx) New Southeastern Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 30,000,000(lxi) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Feasibility study, design and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction of building upgrades. Demolition, renovation, general repairs and expansion, including land development and site infrastructure improvements of the six Veterans Homes Project Allocation 126,000,000(lxii) Military and Veterans Affairs buildings, Statewide(A) Improvements, including the addition of veterans outreach centers, to provide services in areas that have demonstrated the greatest needProject Allocation 21,000,000(11) Office of Administration(i) Commonwealth Technology Center, Dauphin County(A) Miscellaneous replacement of building systems equipment, including mechanical, electrical and plumbing equipmentProject Allocation 11,500,000(B) UPS system replacement. Miscellaneous replacement of building systems equipment, including mechanical, electrical and plumbing equipmentProject Allocation 2,500,000(12) Pennsylvania State Police(i) Pennsylvania State Police Academy, Dauphin County(A) Rehabilitate the Academy complex, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including site acquisition and developmentProject Allocation 163,000,000(ii) Regional forensic laboratory(A) Renovate and/or construct new laboratory in Central Pennsylvania, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 90,500,000(iii) Statewide(A) Capital renewal of facilities and new construction, including site and building improvements, interior renovations, building system upgrades, code-required improvements, security enhancements such as perimeter fencing and upgrade or replacement of fueling stations, including, if applicable, establishment of electric vehicle charging stationsProject Allocation 200,000,000(B) Land acquisition or purchase of facility to replace buildings or provide new facilities to further the mission of the State Police, to include exercising an option to purchase real property contained in a lease that was fully executed before the effective date of this statute, and deemed in the best interest of the 20250SB0292PN0269 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth and State PoliceProject Allocation 250,000,000(13) State System of Higher Education(i) Commonwealth University(A) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructure.Project Allocation 20,000,000(B) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Stevenson LibraryProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Bloomsburg University, Columbia County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 30,000,000(D) Mansfield University, Tioga County. Provide for deferred maintenance needs and capital renewal repairsProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) PennWest University(A) Clarion, Clarion County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Clarion, Clarion County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilities20250SB0292PN0269 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 29,000,000(C) Edinboro, Erie County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(D) Edinboro, Erie County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 23,000,000(E) California, Washington County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(F) California, Washington County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 30,000,000(iii) Kutztown University, Berks County(A) Demolition of underutilized and obsolete buildingsProject Allocation 30,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Old MainProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Slippery Rock University, Butler County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Eisenberg classroom buildingProject Allocation 40,000,000(B) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(v) West Chester University, Chester County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(vi) Cheyney University, Chester and Delaware Counties(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Dudley Center for the Arts Project Allocation 8,000,000(vii) Shippensburg University, Cumberland County(A) Heiges Field House renovation and additionProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 25,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) Indiana University, Indiana County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) New construction, alterations, and infrastructure upgrades for a new academic commons replacementProject Allocation 45,000,000(ix) Millersville University, Lancaster County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Pucillo HallProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations, and infrastructure upgradeProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus ADA infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(D) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Biemsderfer StadiumProject Allocation 8,000,000(x) East Stroudsburg University, Monroe County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Linden Hall20250SB0292PN0269 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 50,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xi) State System of Higher Education, Systemwide(A) Renovations, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 30,000,000(B) Demolition of underutilized and obsolete buildingsProject Allocation 20,000,000(14) Department of Transportation(i) Adams County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility. May include site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,200,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250SB0292PN0269 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,780,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(ii) Allegheny County(A) District Office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 11-0Project Allocation 30,800,000(B) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new, and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,400,000(C) Fleet Management (Western). New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing Western training facility, including site 20250SB0292PN0269 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,000,000(E) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility,including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,875,000(F) Maintenance facility-county office. Super garage. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility to combine the Allegheny, Beaver and Fort Pitt Tunnel maintenance units into a combined garage and administration building, including auxiliary buildings. May include site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 120,000,000(G) Maintenance facility-stockpile. 20250SB0292PN0269 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Armstrong County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 37,850,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250SB0292PN0269 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,200,000(iv) Beaver County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 10,450,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20250SB0292PN0269 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 4,000,000(v) Bedford County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 7,075,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 8,300,000(vi) Berks County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250SB0292PN0269 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 17,775,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Weigh station. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of a Transportation/State Police inspection facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 60,000,000(vii) Blair County(A) District office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 9-0Project Allocation 41,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 32,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,335,000(viii) Bradford County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site 20250SB0292PN0269 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 43,425,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(ix) Bucks County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design 20250SB0292PN0269 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 39,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 3,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site P, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 10,157,000(F) Welcome Center. Renovate and expand Welcome Center Site P, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 40,000,000(x) Butler County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 19,605,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xi) Cambria County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20250SB0292PN0269 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 13,750,000(B) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,425,000(xii) Cameron County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,825,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250SB0292PN0269 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xiii) Carbon County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 51,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new 20250SB0292PN0269 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(E) Paint truck storage building. The proposed new line painting truck maintenance building for traffic line painting operationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(xiv) Centre County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structures20250SB0292PN0269 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,800,000(xv) Chester County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 34,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(xvi) Clarion County20250SB0292PN0269 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,238,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xvii) Clearfield County(A) District Office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 41,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250SB0292PN0269 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 9,700,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xviii) Clinton County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 27,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250SB0292PN0269 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xix) Columbia County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 8,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xx) Crawford County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,650,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 4,025,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(E) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxi) Cumberland County(A) General storage buildings. Construct 20250SB0292PN0269 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 23,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxii) Dauphin County(A) Keystone Building. To provide for the reorganization of Transportation Offices to meet changing program needsProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) District Office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 39,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Fleet management facility. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,500,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,500,000(E) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 6,700,000(F) Materials testing laboratory. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,000,000(G) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expand Rest Site 46, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(H) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 47, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(I) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 48, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(J) Sign shop facility. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,000,000(K) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,200,000(xxiii) Delaware County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 31,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 6,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including 20250SB0292PN0269 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site N, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 35,450,000(xxiv) Elk County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxv) Erie County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site 20250SB0292PN0269 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,638,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site L, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 34,000,000(E) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site M, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20250SB0292PN0269 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 20,000,000(xxvi) Fayette County(A) District Office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 35,000,000(B) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,000,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 6,000,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxvii) Forest County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 5,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxviii) Franklin County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,625,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program requirementsProject Allocation 7,560,000(C) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site G, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 18,500,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 3,000,000(xxix) Fulton County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 10,075,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 3, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(E) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site B, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 22,450,000(xxx) Greene County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,100,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site D, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 32,200,000(xxxi) Huntingdon County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work20250SB0292PN0269 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 9,770,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xxxii) Indiana County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 30,150,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,603,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 8,950,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,500,000(xxxiii) Jefferson County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 25,350,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. 20250SB0292PN0269 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 25, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 26, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiv) Juniata County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 24,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20250SB0292PN0269 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(xxxv) Lackawanna County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 37,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 10,285,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250SB0292PN0269 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 55, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxvi) Lancaster County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,400,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program requirementsProject Allocation 3,780,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxvii) Lawrence County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work20250SB0292PN0269 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 22,275,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(xxxviii) Lebanon County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Fleet management (Eastern). New 20250SB0292PN0269 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing Eastern training facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 14,925,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(E) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,150,000(xxxix) Lehigh County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations 20250SB0292PN0269 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 40,425,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,550,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing 20250SB0292PN0269 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 containment structuresProject Allocation 5,000,000(xl) Luzerne County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 32,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,780,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 3,000,000(xli) Lycoming County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 38,500,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,125,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xlii) McKean County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,125,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250SB0292PN0269 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(xliii) Mercer County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 17,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250SB0292PN0269 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 17, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Roadside rest facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 18, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 2,500,000(F) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site E, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 14,225,000(xliv) Mifflin County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,325,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(xlv) Monroe County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,050,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing 20250SB0292PN0269 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site F, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 20,500,000(xlvi) Montgomery County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 41,260,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work20250SB0292PN0269 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 29,100,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(E) Parking garage. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing parking garage at the District 6 Engineering Office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 14,000,000(F) Regional traffic management center. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing regional traffic management center at the District 6 Engineering Office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work20250SB0292PN0269 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 70,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(xlvii) Montour County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,800,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(xlviii) Northampton County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design 20250SB0292PN0269 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,425,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 11,500,000(xlix) Northumberland County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,425,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(l) Perry County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20250SB0292PN0269 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 37,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 40,000,000(li) Philadelphia County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. 20250SB0292PN0269 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Design, construction and general improvements to all Philadelphia Regional Port AuthorityProject Allocation 150,000,000(D) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Maintenance dredging of all Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilities, including permitting activitiesProject Allocation 60,000,000(E) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Sustainability/resiliency at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 100,000,000(F) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. General improvements to include acquisition and development of infrastructure to support the handling of both general and passenger cargo at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 160,600,000(G) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Container capacity development at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 244,000,000(H) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Acquisition of Ship to Store Cranes 20250SB0292PN0269 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for use at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 85,800,000(I) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Berth development at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilities to include capital dredgingProject Allocation 137,500,000(J) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. General improvements to the Tioga Marine Terminal infrastructure, and adjacent properties, to include berth rehabilitation, two container cranes and warehouse developmentProject Allocation 125,000,000(lii) Pike County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 25,800,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20250SB0292PN0269 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 12,000,000(C) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site K, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 33,850,000(liii) Potter County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 2,900,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(liv) Schuylkill County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,850,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(lv) Snyder County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20250SB0292PN0269 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 46,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lvi) Somerset County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility workProject Allocation 17,500,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(lvii) Sullivan County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 24,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lviii) Susquehanna County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site 20250SB0292PN0269 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 19,650,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site H, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 33,180,000(lix) Tioga County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design 20250SB0292PN0269 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 11,825,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site T, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 18,500,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (lx) Union County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 42,000,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lxi) Venango County(A) District Office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 1-0Project Allocation 31,905,000(B) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20250SB0292PN0269 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 13,750,000(C) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,925,000(D) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lxii) Warren County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 13,750,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility workProject Allocation 17,925,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 4,500,000(lxiii) Washington County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,250,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program requirementsProject Allocation 7,000,000(C) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site A, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 18,000,000(D) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 5,500,000(lxiv) Wayne County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 8,600,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxv) Westmoreland County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 11,200,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,800,000(C) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 1,500,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (lxvi) Wyoming County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,040,000(B) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(lxvii) York County(A) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 26,550,000(B) Maintenance facility-county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design 20250SB0292PN0269 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Maintenance facility-stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or a renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 6,780,000(D) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site J, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 7,000,000(E) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 2,500,000(lxviii) Statewide(A) Weigh stations. Construct new, upgrade, replace to provide for the construction or renovation of Transportation/State Police inspection facilities, including site acquisition 20250SB0292PN0269 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work. Construction of six facilities StatewideProject Allocation 360,000,000(15) Department of Health(i) Bureau of Laboratories(A) Construct new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 30,500,000Section 4. Itemization of furniture and equipment projects.Additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of movable furniture and equipment to complete public improvement projects and to be purchased by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial cost, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Agriculture (Reserved)(2) Department of Conservation and Natural Resources(i) Point State Park, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for park office renovationsProject Allocation 819,000(ii) Delaware Canal State Park, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment for new resource center with storage buildingProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Big Elk Creek State Park, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(iv) Forestry Lab, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new laboratoryProject Allocation 3,000,000(v) Geologic Survey Headquarters, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new headquarters of the Bureau of Geologic SurveyProject Allocation 2,000,000(vi) Pinchot State Forest, Luzerne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for Pinchot Forest District resource management center complexProject Allocation 700,000(vii) Maurice K. Goddard State Park, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for redevelopment of park facilitiesProject Allocation 750,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) Denten Hill State Park, Potter County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for redevelopment of park facilitiesProject Allocation 500,000(ix) Vosburg Neck State Park, Wyoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(x) Susquehanna Riverlands State Park, York County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(xi) Training Academy and Range, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for Bureau of State Parks Training Academy infrastructure and rangeProject Allocation 2,000,000(3) Department of Corrections(i) State Correctional Institution at Benner, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,050,000(ii) State Correctional Institution at Rockview, Centre County20250SB0292PN0269 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 7,500,000(iii) Quehanna Boot Camp, Clearfield County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) State Correctional Institution at Cambridge Springs, Crawford County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(v) State Correctional Institution at Camp Hill, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 15,000,000(vi) State Correctional Institution at Chester, Delaware County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(vii) State Correctional Institution at Forest, Forest County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(viii) State Correctional Institution at Pine Grove, Indiana County(A) Provide original furniture and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(ix) State Correctional Institution at Elizabethtown Training Academy, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(x) State Correctional Institution at Muncy, Lycoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 8,000,000(xi) State Correctional Institution at Mercer, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xii) State Correctional Institution at Phoenix, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,050,000(xiii) State Correctional Institution at Frackville, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 500,000(xiv) State Correctional Institution at Mahanoy, Schuylkill County20250SB0292PN0269 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(xv) State Correctional Institution at Waymart, Wayne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(4) Department of Education(i) The Pennsylvania State University(A) Smith Building - Altoona Campus, Blair County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Chiller unit - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Former Palmer Museum of Art - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 7,000,000(D) General academic building - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or 20250SB0292PN0269 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 7,000,000(E) General research building - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 7,000,000(F) Greenhouse and headhouse complexes relocation (PlantWorks) - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture, fixtures and equipment for the relocation of the greenhouse and headhouse complexes, also known as PlantWorks, at Penn State University ParkProject Allocation 20,000,000(G) Millennium Science Complex II - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 20,000,000(H) Pasquerilla Spiritual Center - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 3,000,000(I) Classroom/class lab building - 20250SB0292PN0269 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 5,050,000(J) Stone Valley Forestry Building - University Park, Huntingdon County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Lincoln University(A) 3020 Market Street, University City District, Philadelphia County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(B) Center for Black Culture, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 4,000,000(C) Cresson Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Faculty and staff housing upgrades, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 1,250,00020250SB0292PN0269 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Heritage Center, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 375,000(F) Houston Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Lincoln Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationProject Allocation 4,000,000(H) Manuel Rivero (Hall) Gymnasium, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 14,000,000(I) McCauley Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(J) McRary Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(K) Nelson Science Center, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 1,250,000(L) New residence hall, Chester County. 20250SB0292PN0269 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Original furniture and equipment for new residence hallProject Allocation 5,000,000(M) Physical plant, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for new residence hallProject Allocation 2,500,000(N) University Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(O) Vail Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 4,000,000(P) Ware Center for the Performing Arts, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(iii) Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology(A) Community Learning Center, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Dormitories, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(C) Hartzell Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for 20250SB0292PN0269 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(D) Jones Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(E) Leonard Hall, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(F) Mellor Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 15,000,000(G) New multipurpose building/dormitory, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for additionProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Schwalm Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 4,500,000(I) Snyder Hall, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 4,000,000(5) Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency (Reserved)(6) Department of Environmental Protection (Reserved)20250SB0292PN0269 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Department of General Services(i) Statewide(A) Furniture, fixtures and equipment for space consolidation effortsProject Allocation 100,000,000(8) Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission(i) State Museum of Pennsylvania, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated State MuseumProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Furniture and equipment for building rehabilitationProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) State Archives, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated State Archives buildingProject Allocation 8,000,000(iii) Landis Valley Village and Farm Museum, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated Visitor CenterProject Allocation 2,000,000(9) Department of Human Services(i) South Mountain Secure Treatment Unit, Franklin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment to support building 20250SB0292PN0269 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation projectsProject Allocation 5,000,000(ii) Norristown Forensic Building, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for the Norristown Forensic BuildingProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) Selinsgrove Center, Snyder County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment to support central building renovation projectProject Allocation 5,000,000(iv) Torrance State Hospital, Westmoreland County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 5,000,000(10) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs(i) Gettysburg Readiness Center, Adams County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Combined Support Maintenance Shop, West Pittsburgh, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Pittsburgh Crane Readiness Center, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) Ford City Readiness Center, Armstrong County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(v) Beaver Falls Readiness Center, Beaver County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(vi) Berks County Readiness Center, Berks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(vii) Hollidaysburg Readiness Center, Blair County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(viii) Bucks County Readiness Centers, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(ix) Bucks County Readiness Centers and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Maintenance Facilities, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(x) Butler Readiness Center, Butler County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xi) Cambria County Readiness Centers, Cambria County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xii) Cambria County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Cambria County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiii) Lehighton Readiness Centers, Carbon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiv) Centre County Readiness Centers, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiv) Centre County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Centre County20250SB0292PN0269 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvi) State College Army and Air Readiness Center, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvii) Chester County Readiness Centers, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 3,000,000(xviii) Chester County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xix) Southeastern Veterans Center, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xx) Clearfield Readiness Center, Clearfield County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxi) Lock Haven Readiness Center, Clinton County20250SB0292PN0269 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxii) Crawford County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Crawford County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxiii) Carlisle Readiness Center, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxiv) Cumberland County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxv) Dauphin County Readiness Centers, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxvi) Erie Readiness Center, Erie County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxvii) Fayette County Readiness Center, Fayette County20250SB0292PN0269 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxviii) Chambersburg Readiness Center, Franklin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxix) Indiana Readiness Center, Indiana County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxx) Carbondale Readiness Center, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxi) Lackawanna County Readiness Center/Field Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxii) Scranton Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiii) Elizabethtown Readiness Center, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiv) New Castle Readiness Center, Lawrence County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxv) Fort Indiantown Gap, Lebanon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 3,000,000(xxxvi) Allentown Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxvii) Luzerne County Readiness Centers, Luzerne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxxviii) Williamsport Readiness Center, Lycoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxix) Mercer County Readiness Centers, Mercer County20250SB0292PN0269 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xl) Mercer County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xli) Montgomery County Readiness Centers, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlii) Montgomery County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(xliii) Danville Field Maintenance Building, Montour County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xliv) Montour County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Montour County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlv) Easton Readiness Center, Northampton 20250SB0292PN0269 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlvi) Philadelphia County Readiness Centers, Philadelphia County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlvii) Schuylkill Readiness Center, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlviii) Friedens Readiness Centers, Somerset County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlix) Washington Readiness Center, Washington County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(l) Honesdale Readiness Center, Wayne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(li) Westmoreland County Readiness Centers, Westmoreland County20250SB0292PN0269 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lii) York County Readiness Centers, York County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(liii) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations to six Veterans HomesProject Allocation 3,000,000(liv) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations to six Veterans HomesProject Allocation 5,000,000(11) State System of Higher Education(i) Commonwealth University(A) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Original furniture and equipment for Stevenson LibraryProject Allocation 3,000,000(ii) PennWest University(A) Edinboro, Erie County. Original furniture and equipment for Wiley HallProject Allocation 1,500,000(iii) Kutztown University, Berks County(A) Original furniture and equipment for 20250SB0292PN0269 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Beekey Education BuildingProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Original furniture and equipment for Rickenbach Education BuildingProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Original furniture and equipment for Keystone Hall/fieldhouse upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) West Chester University, Chester County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 4,000,000(v) Cheyney University, Chester and Delaware Counties(A) Original furniture and equipment for Ada Georges Dining HallProject Allocation 4,100,000(vi) Indiana University, Indiana County(A) Original furniture and equipment for academic buildingProject Allocation 6,800,000(vii) Millersville University, Lancaster County(A) Original furniture and equipment for Pucillo HallProject Allocation 1,700,000(12) Office of Administration (Reserved)(13) Pennsylvania State Police(i) Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipmentProject Allocation 100,000,000(14) Department of Transportation(i) Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for maintenance facilityProject Allocation 600,000Section 5. Itemization of transportation assistance projects.(a) Mass transit.--Additional capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects for mass transit in which an interest is to be acquired or constructed by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Allegheny County(i) Pittsburgh Regional Transit(A) Bus replacement program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses.Project Allocation 50,000,000(B) Infrastructure Safety Renewal Program. Improvements to stations, signals, track, power, fixed guideways, bridges, tunnels, incline and operating/maintenance facilitiesProject Allocation 50,000,000(C) Bus and Rail Vehicle Overhaul Program. Overhaul of existing bus and 20250SB0292PN0269 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rail car assetsProject Allocation 50,000,000(D) ITS Hardware/Software Program. Hardware and software for intelligent station real time signage, including information technology infrastructure and enterprise softwareProject Allocation 50,000,000(E) New bus operating facility. This project will provides Pittsburgh Regional Transit a new operating facility with the capacity of 230 buses, and supports both diesel and electric busesProject Allocation 236,000,000(2) Bucks, Chester, Delaware, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties(i) Southeastern Pennsylvania Transportation Authority(A) Urbanized Area Formula Program of Projects. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses and rehabilitate or replace various facilities and infrastructure to improve the system and bring assets to a state of good repairProject Allocation 150,000,000(B) Federal State of Good Repair Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to rehabilitate or replace 20250SB0292PN0269 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 existing facilities, vehicles and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 220,000,000(C) Bus and Bus Facilities Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to rehabilitate or replace existing bus facilities and vehicles to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 70,000,000(D) Bus Purchase Flex Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses and rehabilitate or replace various facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 50,000,000(E) Federal Grant Program. Projects include vehicle purchases and overhauls; signal system modernization; accessibility, stations and parking; new payment technologies, system improvements and state-of-good-repair initiativesProject Allocation 250,000,000(F) Infrastructure Safety Renewal Program. Rehabilitate or replace existing facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good 20250SB0292PN0269 - 185 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 repairProject Allocation 250,000,000(G) State of Good Repair Program. Rehabilitate or replace existing facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 110,000,000(H) System Improvements Program. Improve transit service in Southeastern PennsylvaniaProject Allocation 150,000,000Section 6. Itemization of redevelopment assistance projects.Additional capital projects in the category of redevelopment assistance projects for capital grants by the Department of Community and Economic Development, its successors or assigns, authorized under the provisions of the act of May 20, 1949 (P.L.1633, No.493), known as the Housing and Redevelopment Assistance Law, and redevelopment assistance capital projects and to be financed by the incurring of debt, are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) (Reserved)Section 7. Itemization of flood control projects.Additional capital projects in the category of flood control projects to be constructed by the Department of Environmental Protection, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated costs, as follows:20250SB0292PN0269 - 186 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Environmental Protection(i) Core Creek Dam, Bucks County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 3,300,000(ii) Thatcher Run Dam, Crawford County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 850,000(iii) Rainbow Dam, Crawford County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) Kintz Creek Dam, Pike County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 850,000(v) Hamilton Dam, Tioga County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 3,900,000(2) (Reserved)Section 8. Itemization of Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission capital projects.Capital projects in the category of public improvement projects to be acquired or developed by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and to be financed by the incurring of debt or by the current revenues of the Fish Fund and the Boat Fund pursuant to executive authorizations are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated costs, as follows:ProjectTotal Project Allocation(1) Fish and Boat Commission20250SB0292PN0269 - 187 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Fisheries Area 6 Office, Bucks County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(ii) Bellefonte State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,600,000(iii) Benner Spring State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace 20250SB0292PN0269 - 188 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation3,400,000(iv) Pleasant Gap State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation7,500,000(v) Spring Creek Canyon Trail, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a two-lane bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation2,800,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate, remove or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation500,000(C) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a one-lane bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenances20250SB0292PN0269 - 189 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation2,200,000(vi) Kahle Lake, Clarion and Venango Counties (A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(vii) Tylersville State Fish Hatchery, Clinton County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation8,000,000(viii) Huntsdale State Fish Hatchery, Cumberland County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation26,500,000(B) Design, permit and construct facilities for the remediation of PCB contaminated soils and monitor environmental remediations20250SB0292PN0269 - 190 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation7,500,000(ix) Lake Erie State Fish Hatchery, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties to construct fish rearing and research facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructure for the acquisition and development of the Lake Erie State Fish Hatchery, or for the expansion and development of another fish rearing facility in Erie CountyProject Allocation25,000,000(x) North East Marina, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct new or rehabilitate existing infrastructure to support a day use/seasonal public access area and boat launchProject Allocation18,000,000(xi) Trout Run Steel Head Collection Facility, Erie County(A) Design, permit, construct, rehabilitate or improve fish collection facilities and related infrastructure and demolition of existing in-stream concrete structures, retaining walls and related infrastructure20250SB0292PN0269 - 191 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation5,000,000(xii) Union City State Fish Hatchery, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation2,500,000(xiii) Walnut Creek Marina, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct or rehabilitate marina-related infrastructure to improve slip capacity, parking and boating and fishing accessProject Allocation12,000,000(xiv) Maintenance Area 1/Fisheries Area 2 Office, Forest County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(xv) Tionesta State Fish Hatchery, Forest County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructure20250SB0292PN0269 - 192 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation5,000,000(xvi) Hemlock Lake, Indiana County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary, at Hemlock LakeProject Allocation2,000,000(xvii) Cloe Lake, Jefferson County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation8,500,000(xviii) Fords Lake, Lackawanna County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(xix) Harris Pond, Luzerne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties 20250SB0292PN0269 - 193 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(xx) Minsi Lake, Northampton County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation5,200,000(xxi) Oswayo State Fish Hatchery, Potter County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation6,500,000(xxii) High Point Lake, Somerset County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary, at High Point Lake20250SB0292PN0269 - 194 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation2,000,000(xxiii) Hunters Lake, Sullivan County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation1,500,000(xxiv) Fisheries Area 5 Office, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(xxv) Miller Pond, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary at Miller PondProject Allocation1,500,000(xxvi) Pleasant Mount State Fish Hatchery, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, 20250SB0292PN0269 - 195 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation9,500,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace bridges, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation5,600,000(C) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,600,000(xxvii) White Oak Pond, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary at White Oak PondProject Allocation1,500,000(xxviii) Polk/Sandy Creek bridge removal, Venango County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or remove an abandoned railroad bridge, including repair and replacement of 20250SB0292PN0269 - 196 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,500,000(2) (Reserved)Section 9. Debt authorization.(a) Public improvements.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(a).(b) Furniture and equipment.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(b) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment specifically itemized in the capital budget.(c) Transportation assistance.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(c) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the transportation assistance projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.20250SB0292PN0269 - 197 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Redevelopment assistance.--Subject to the limitations in section 2.1 of the act of May 29, 2020 (P.L.205, No.25), known as the Capital Budget Act of 2019-2020, the Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(d) as may be found necessary to carry out the redevelopment assistance capital projects specifically itemized in the capital budget.(e) Flood control.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(e) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the flood control projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.(f) Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission projects.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate specified in section 2(f) to carry out the acquisition and construction of the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.Section 10. Issue of bonds.20250SB0292PN0269 - 198 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The indebtedness authorized in this act shall be incurred from time to time and shall be evidenced by one or more series of general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth in such aggregate principal amount for each series as the Governor, the Auditor General and the State Treasurer shall determine, but the latest stated maturity date shall not exceed the estimated useful life of the projects being financed as stated in section 11.Section 11. Estimated useful life and term of debt.(a) Estimated useful life.--The General Assembly states that the estimated useful life of the capital projects itemized in this act is as follows:(1) Public improvement projects, 30 years.(2) Furniture and equipment, 10 years.(3) Transportation assistance projects:(i) Rolling stock, 15 years.(ii) Passenger buses, 12 years.(iii) Furniture and equipment, 10 years.(iv) All others, 30 years.(4) Redevelopment assistance projects, 30 years.(b) Term of debt.--The maximum term of the debt authorized to be incurred under this act is 30 years.Section 12. Appropriations.(a) Public improvements.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of General Services in the maximum amount specified in section 2(a) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the public improvement projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of 20250SB0292PN0269 - 199 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of General Services the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(b) Furniture and equipment.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of General Services in the maximum amount specified in section 2(b) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of General Services the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(c) Transportation assistance.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Transportation in the maximum amount specified in section 2(c) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the transportation assistance projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Transportation the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(d) Redevelopment assistance.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Community and Economic Development in the maximum amount specified in section 2(d) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the redevelopment assistance capital 20250SB0292PN0269 - 200 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Community and Economic Development the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(e) Flood control.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection in the maximum amount specified in section 2(e) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the flood control projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Environmental Protection the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.Section 13. Federal funds.(a) Projects itemized in this act.--All money received from the Federal Government for the projects specifically itemized in this act are also hereby appropriated for those projects.(b) Projects not requiring itemization.--Department of Military and Veterans Affairs construction projects which are totally federally funded and to be administered by the Department of General Services are hereby authorized.Section 14. Editorial changes.In editing and preparing this act for printing following the final enactment, the Legislative Reference Bureau shall insert or revise letters or numbers for projects where the letters or numbers are missing or require revision. The Legislative Reference Bureau shall also revise the total monetary amounts for the total authorization, debt authorization, appropriations 20250SB0292PN0269 - 201 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and department totals as necessary to agree with the total monetary amounts of the projects.Section 15. Delegation.Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of General Services may delegate the design and construction of the projects contained in:(1) Section 3(1)(i) of this act to The Pennsylvania State University.(2) Section 3(1)(iii) of this act to the University of Pennsylvania.(3) Section 3(a)(1)(ii)(B) of the act of November 1, 2013 (P.L.680, No.85), known as the Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2013-2014, to the University of Pennsylvania.Section 16. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0292PN0269 - 202 - 12345678910111213141516